Maine, session 132, LD1203.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA c. 223, sub-c. 10, headnote is amended to read:
SUBCHAPTER 10
YOUTH BEHAVIORAL AND MENTAL HEALTH FIRST AID TRAINING
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §6672 is enacted to read:
§6672. Behavioral and mental health grant program
1. Grant program. The department shall establish and administer a grant program to
provide grants to school administrative units that contract for behavioral and mental health
services provided by licensed behavioral and mental health service providers.
2. Limitation on use of funds. Funds provided under the grant program under this
section may be used only for behavioral and mental health services that are not otherwise
covered or reimbursable through the MaineCare program. Funds must be used in a manner
that ensures that contracted behavioral and mental health service providers do not supplant
qualified and available school administrative unit behavioral and mental health staff.
3. Grant program funding based on clinicians needed. In administering the grant
program under this section, the department shall provide grant funds to a school
administrative unit based on the number of clinicians needed by the school administrative
unit and in the amount of:
A. Prior to July 1, 2027, $20,000 per clinician; and
B. Beginning July 1, 2027, $25,000 per clinician.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
School and Student Supports Z270
Initiative: Provides one-time funds for grants to school administrative units for contracted
behavioral and mental health services for students. The grants are based on how many
clinicians the school administrative unit needs at a cost of $20,000 per clinician.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,000,000 $3,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,000,000 $3,000,000